test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_sijvo_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:

  Noun - sijvo: # ok SIJVO
    sijvo+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
    sijvo+N+Sg+Gen:  [siijvo, sijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Acc:  [siijvo, sijvo]
    sijvo+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
    sijvo+N+Sg+Loc:  siijvost
    sijvo+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
    sijvo+N+Sg+Abe:  sijvottáá
    sijvo+N+Ess:  sijvon
    sijvo+N+Par:  sijvod
    sijvo+N+Pl+Nom:  [siijvoh, sijvoh]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Gen:  [siijvoi, sijvoi]
    sijvo+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
    sijvo+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Com:  sijvoiguin
    sijvo+N+Pl+Abe:  sijvoittáá

#  Noun - sijvo: # check this and previous.
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Nom:  sijvo
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Gen: [sijvo, siijvo]
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Acc: [sijvo, siijvo]
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Ill:  siijvon
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Loc: [siijvost, sijvoost]
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Com:  sijvoin
#    sijvo+N+Sg+Abe:  sijvottáá
#    sijvo+N+Ess:  sijvon
#    sijvo+N+Par:  sijvod
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Nom: [siijvoh, sijvoh]
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Gen: [siijvoi, sijvoi]
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Acc:  siijvoid
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Ill:  sijvoid
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Loc:  siijvoin
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Com:  sijvoiguin
#    sijvo+N+Pl+Abe:  sijvoittáá

  Noun - rijdo: # ok SIJVO
    rijdo+N+Sg+Nom:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Gen:  [riijdo, rijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Acc:  [riijdo, rijdo]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Ill:  riijdon
    rijdo+N+Sg+Loc:  riijdost
    rijdo+N+Sg+Com:  rijdoin
    rijdo+N+Sg+Abe:  rijdottáá
    rijdo+N+Ess:  rijdon
    rijdo+N+Par:  rijdod
    rijdo+N+Pl+Nom:  [riijdoh, rijdoh]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [riijdoi, rijdoi]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Acc:  riijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Ill:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Loc:  riijdoin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Com:  rijdoiguin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Abe:  rijdoittáá

  Noun - pivdo: # ok SIJVO
    pivdo+N+Sg+Nom:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Gen:  [piivdo, pivdo]
    pivdo+N+Sg+Acc:  [piivdo, pivdo]
    pivdo+N+Sg+Ill:  piivdon
    pivdo+N+Sg+Loc:  piivdost # also pivdoost sometimes in use, not very common
    pivdo+N+Sg+Com:  pivdoin
    pivdo+N+Sg+Abe:  pivdottáá
    pivdo+N+Ess:  pivdon
    pivdo+N+Par:  pivdod
    pivdo+N+Pl+Nom:  [piivdoh, pivdoh]
    pivdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [piivdoi, pivdoi]
    pivdo+N+Pl+Acc:  piivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Ill:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Loc:  piivdoin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Com:  pivdoiguin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Abe:  pivdoittáá

  Noun - nijtto: # ok
    nijtto+N+Sg+Nom:  nijtto
    nijtto+N+Sg+Gen:  [nijto, niijto]
    nijtto+N+Sg+Acc:  [nijto, niijto]
    nijtto+N+Sg+Ill:  niijton
    nijtto+N+Sg+Loc: niijtost
    nijtto+N+Sg+Com:  nijttoin
    nijtto+N+Sg+Abe:  nijtottáá
    nijtto+N+Ess:  nijtton
    nijtto+N+Par:  nijttod
    nijtto+N+Pl+Nom:  [nijtoh, niijtoh]
    nijtto+N+Pl+Gen: [niijtoi, nijtoi]
    nijtto+N+Pl+Acc:  niijtoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Ill:  nijttoid
    nijtto+N+Pl+Loc:  niijtoin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Com:  nijtoiguin
    nijtto+N+Pl+Abe:  nijtoittáá
